Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 2. District Boundary Board
§ 21-6-226.
Boundaries of school districts; filing with the department of revenue.

Each school district board shall file a copy of an official map or legal description designating the geographical boundaries of the school district or the changes to its geographical boundaries with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the district is located in accordance with the department’s rules adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-11-102(c)(xxiv) regarding tax districts and as follows:

Within ten (10) days after the effective date of formation; and

Annually, by a date determined by the department, if the school district has changes to its geographical boundaries in the preceding year.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to develop an accurate and comprehensive database of the property within each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of property taxes within that governmental entity. Regardless of the date of formation, each governmental entity in the state with the power to levy or to require the levy of ad valorem taxes shall file a map or legal description designating the current geographical boundaries of the governmental entity with the department of revenue, the county assessor and the county clerk in the county or counties within which the entity is located in accordance with the department's rules regarding tax districts. Not later than August 1, 2005, the department shall notify each governmental entity subject to the provisions of this section of the entity's most recent filing with the department and whether that filing meets the requirements of this act. If a governmental entity subject to the provisions of this act has not met the requirements of this act, or if its most recent filing with the department is no longer accurate, it shall file not later than November 1, 2005 a map or other legal description of its current boundaries in accordance with this act and the department's rules on taxing districts. Thereafter, filings shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 108, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.